Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska35-1006
Benefits; maximum amount.

The combined total of all benefits received by any firefighter pursuant to subdivisions (1)(a) and (b) of section 35-1005 during his or her lifetime shall not exceed fifty thousand dollars.

Laws 2021, LB432, § 5.